Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-12,103
Ruling reviewable.

The determination of such laws shall be made by the court and not by the jury, and shall be reviewable.

Laws 1947, c. 93, § 3, p. 273.

Issue of validity of marriage in another state was properly pleaded and presented. Abramson v. Abramson, 161 Neb. 782, 74 N.W.2d 919 (1956).